Massachusetts, session 194th, H5358.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) The city of Newton may impose a lien on property located within the
city for any local charge, fee or fine that has not been paid by the due date. This lien shall be
known as a municipal charges lien. For purposes of this act, "local charge, fee or fine" shall
mean any charge, fee or fine imposed by the city pursuant to the city code, city ordinance, city
regulations, general or special laws or state regulations and any charge, fee or fine imposed by a
court payable to the city as a result of any action initiated by the city to enforce the city code,
city regulations, general or special laws or state regulations.
(b) A lien authorized pursuant to this act shall take effect upon the recording of the
unpaid local charge, fee or fine by parcel of land and by the name of the property owner assessed
for the charge, fee or fine in the Middlesex southern district registry of deeds.
of 2

(c) If a local charge, fee or fine that is secured by a municipal charges lien remains
unpaid when the city assessors are preparing a real estate tax list and warrant to be committed
under section 53 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, the board or officer in charge of the
collection of the local charge, fee or fine shall certify such charge, fee or fine to the assessors,
who shall add the charge, fee or fine to the tax on the property to which it relates and commit it
with the warrant to the collector of taxes as part of such tax.
(d) If the property to which such charge, fee or fine relates is tax exempt, the charge, fee
or fine shall be committed as the tax.
(e) A lien under this section may be discharged by filing in the Middlesex southern
district registry of deeds, a certificate from the treasurer-collector that all municipal charges, fees
or fines constituting the lien, together with any interest and costs thereon, have been paid or
legally abated.
(f) All costs of recording or discharging a lien under this act shall be borne by the owner
of the property.
(g) Prior to any lien being imposed for any local charge, fee or fine, a vote of the city
council shall be taken specifying each type of charge, fee or fine to be collected under this act.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2